Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1006.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 602 and 603 of the act of April 28, 1937 (P.L.417, No.105), known as the Milk Marketing Law, are amended to read:Section 602. Certified Testers.--It shall be unlawful for any milk dealer to buy or receive milk from producers, or to sell or deliver milk to stores or consumers, on the basis of, or with reference to, the amount of butterfat or appropriate milk components contained in such milk, unless the butterfat or component tests thereof is conducted by a tester certified by the board.The certified tester shall keep an accurate record of all tests made, and copies of such record shall be kept for a period of two (2) years by him and by the milk dealer.Any person who, upon the effective date of this act, is the holder of a certificate of proficiency for milk testing issued after examination conducted by the Pennsylvania Department of Agriculture, shall, upon application to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, furnishing information including that pertaining to good character and to the apparatus and methods used in testing, be issued a certificate and be designated therein as a certified tester.Any person who is not the holder of such certificate of proficiency upon the effective date of this act, shall, prior to applying for a tester's certificate, apply to the board for a certificate of proficiency. Such application shall be accompanied by a fee [of five dollars ($5.00).] established under section 7 of the act of July 1, 1978 (P.L.730, No.132), 20250HB1006PN1093 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 known as the "Milk Marketing Fee Act." The applicant shall be required to pass an examination in milk testing, reasonably prescribed and conducted by the board, and upon approval of the application shall be issued a certificate of proficiency. Thereupon, and [annually] thereafter without such examination, the person so certified may apply for a tester's certificate as herein prescribed.The application for a tester's certificate, accompanied by a fee [of five dollars ($5.00),] established under section 7 of the "Milk Marketing Fee Act," shall be filed, upon a form prescribed by the board, before commencing to test milk[, and annually thereafter on or before December first].The tester's certificate issued hereunder shall be for [the term of one calendar year] a term of no more than two (2) years from the date of issuance, and shall be posted and kept in plain view in the plant in which the certified tester is employed.Section 603. Certified Weighers and Samplers.--It shall be unlawful for any milk dealer to buy or receive milk from producers, or to sell or deliver milk to stores or consumers on the basis of, or with reference to, the amount of butterfat or appropriate milk components contained in such milk, unless the samples taken for testing purposes shall be made by a certified tester or certified weigher and sampler, and according to the method prescribed in this act or in regulations established by the board under this act.It shall be unlawful for any person to pick up milk from farms unless the person making the pickup has a valid tester's certificate or weigher's or sampler's certificate issued by the board.Any person who, upon the effective date of this act, is the 20250HB1006PN1093 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 holder of a certificate of proficiency for milk weighing and sampling issued after examination conducted by the Pennsylvania Department of Agriculture, shall, upon application to the board on a form prescribed by the board furnishing information including that pertaining to good character and to apparatus and methods used in weighing and sampling, be issued a certificate and be designated therein as a certified weigher and sampler.Any person who is not the holder of such certificate of proficiency upon the effective date of this act, shall, prior to applying for a weighing and sampling certificate, apply to the board for a certificate of proficiency. Such application shall be accompanied by a fee [of five dollars ($5.00).] established under section 8 of the act of July 1, 1978 (P.L.730, No.132), known as the "Milk Marketing Fee Act." The applicant shall be required to pass an examination in weighing and sampling milk, reasonably prescribed and conducted by the board, and upon approval of the application shall be issued a certificate of proficiency. Thereupon, and [annually] thereafter without such examination, the person so certified may apply for a certificate as a certified weigher and sampler. The application for such weighing and sampling certificate, accompanied by a fee [of five dollars ($5.00),] established under section 8 of the "Milk Marketing Fee Act," shall be filed, upon a form prescribed by the board, before commencing to sample milk[, and annually thereafter on or before December first].The weighing and sampling certificate issued hereunder shall be for [the term of one calendar year] a term of no more than two (2) years from the date of issuance, and shall be posted and kept in plain view in the room in which the certified weigher and sampler is employed.20250HB1006PN1093 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1006PN1093 - 5 - 1